Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 Regulation of Hospitals and Related Institutions
31-7-6.
Provision of data for research purposes by organizations rendering patient care; liability of providers of data; use of data; confidentiality.

Any hospital, health care facility, medical or skilled nursing home, or other organization rendering patient care may provide information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data relating to the condition and treatment of any person to research groups approved by the medical staff of the institution involved, to governmental health agencies, medical associations and societies, or to any in-hospital medical staff committee, to be used in the course of any study for the purpose of reducing rates of morbidity or mortality; and no liability of any kind or character for damages or other relief shall arise or be enforced against any person or organization by reason of having provided such information or material, or by reason of having released or published the findings and conclusions of such groups to advance medical research or medical education or to achieve the most effective use of health manpower and facilities, or by reason of having released or published generally a summary of such studies.

The research groups approved by the medical staff of the institution involved, governmental health agencies, medical associations and societies, or any in-hospital medical staff committee shall use or publish material described in subsection (a) of this Code section only for the purpose of advancing medical research or medical education, or to achieve the most effective use of health manpower and facilities, in the interest of reducing rates of morbidity or mortality, except that a summary of such studies may be released by any such group for general publication.

In all events the identity of any person whose condition or treatment has been studied pursuant to this Code section shall be confidential and shall not be revealed under any circumstances.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 88-1908, 88-1909, 88-1910, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 310, §§ 1-3.

31-7-7.
Refusal or revocation by public hospital of staff privileges.

Whenever any licensed doctor of medicine, doctor of podiatric medicine, doctor of osteopathic medicine, or doctor of dentistry shall make application for permission to treat patients in any hospital owned or operated by the state, any political subdivision thereof, or any municipality, the hospital shall act in a nondiscriminatory manner upon such application expeditiously and without unnecessary delay considering the applicant on the basis of the applicant’s demonstrated training, experience, competence, and availability and reasonable objectives, including, but not limited to, the appropriate utilization of hospital facilities; but in no event shall final action thereon be taken later than 90 days following receipt of the application; provided, however, whenever the applicant is licensed by any governmental entity outside the continental limits of the United States, the hospital shall have 120 days to take action following receipt of the application. This subsection shall apply solely to applications by licensed doctors of medicine, doctors of podiatric medicine, doctors of osteopathic medicine, and doctors of dentistry who are not members of the staff of the hospital in which privileges are sought at the time an application is submitted and by those not privileged, at such time, to practice in such hospital under a previous grant of privileges. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed so as to repeal the provisions of Code Section 31-7-15, to mandate hospitals to offer or provide any type of service or services not otherwise offered, or to prohibit a hospital with a clinical training program affiliated with a school of medicine from requiring an applicant to have a faculty teaching appointment as a condition of eligibility.

Whenever any hospital owned or operated by the state, any political subdivision thereof, or any municipality shall refuse to grant a licensed doctor of medicine, doctor of podiatric medicine, doctor of osteopathic medicine, or doctor of dentistry the privilege of treating patients in the hospital, wholly or in part, or revoke the privilege of such licensed medical practitioner for treating patients in such hospital, wholly or in part, the hospital shall furnish to the licensed medical practitioner whose privilege has been refused or revoked, within ten days of such action, a written statement of the reasons therefor.

The provisions of this Code section shall not be construed to mandate such hospital to grant or to prohibit such hospital from granting staff privileges to other licensed practitioners of the healing arts who are otherwise qualified for staff privileges pursuant to the bylaws of the governing body of the hospital and, in addition, shall not be construed to modify or restrict the rights of health service provider psychologists to be treated in a nondiscriminatory manner as provided in Code Sections 31-7-161 and 31-7-164.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1911, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 326, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1969, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 967, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 561, § 1.

31-7-7.1.
Denial of staff privileges based upon license, board certification, or membership in professional association.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 31-7-7, if a hospital offers or provides a service which is within the scope of practice of a person licensed as a doctor of podiatric medicine, doctor of osteopathic medicine, or doctor of dentistry, that hospital may not deny to any such licensee staff privileges at such hospital based solely upon that person’s license, board certification, or specialty membership in a professional association.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-7.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 911, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 548, § 1.

31-7-8.
Reports of disciplinary actions against persons authorized to practice professions under Chapter 11, 34, or 35 of Title 43.

The hospital administrator or chief executive officer of each institution subject to this chapter shall submit a written report to the appropriate licensing board when a person who is authorized to practice medicine, osteopathy, podiatry, or dentistry in this state under Chapter 34, Chapter 35, or Chapter 11, respectively, of Title 43 and who is a member of the medical staff at the institution, has medical staff privileges at the institution, or has applied for medical staff privileges at the institution has his medical staff privileges denied, restricted, or revoked for any reason involving the medical care given his patient. Each such administrator or officer shall also report to the appropriate licensing board resignations from practice in that institution by persons licensed under Chapter 34, Chapter 35, or Chapter 11 of Title 43. This Code section shall not require reports of temporary suspensions for failure to comply with medical record regulations.

The written report required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be made within 20 working days following final action by the institution on the restriction, denial, or revocation of medical staff privileges. The results of any legal appeal of such action shall be reported within 20 working days following a final court decision on such appeal.

The report required by this Code section shall contain a statement detailing the nature of the restriction, denial, or revocation of medical staff privileges, the date such action was taken, and the reasons for such action. If the action is a voluntary resignation or restriction of medical staff privileges which was the result of action initiated by the institution, the report shall contain the circumstances involved therein.

There shall be no civil or criminal liability on the part of, and no cause of action for damages shall arise against, any hospital administrator, chief executive officer, or other authorized person who in good faith complies with this Code section.

Except as provided in this subsection and Chapter 34A of Title 43, information contained in any report made to the appropriate licensing board pursuant to this Code section shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed to the public. Access to such reports shall be limited to members of the appropriate licensing board or its staff for their use and to interested institutions for their use in the review of medical staff privileges at the institution.

The failure of an institution to comply with this Code section shall be grounds for the denial, refusal to renew, or revocation of the permit for the operation of the institution issued pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1912, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 257, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 882, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 561, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 192, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 249 (2001).

31-7-9.
Reports by physicians and other personnel of nonaccidental injuries to patients; immunity from liability.

As used in this Code section, the term “medical facility” includes, without being limited to, an ambulatory surgical treatment center defined in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of Code Section 31-7-1 and a freestanding imaging center defined in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (4) of Code Section 31-7-1.

Any:

Physician, including any doctor of medicine licensed to practice under the laws of this state;

Licensed registered nurse employed by a medical facility;

Security personnel employed by a medical facility; or

Other personnel employed by a medical facility whose employment duties involve the care and treatment of patients therein

having cause to believe that a patient has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him other than by accidental means shall report or cause reports to be made in accordance with this Code section.

An oral report shall be made immediately by telephone or otherwise and shall be followed by a report in writing, if requested, to the person in charge of the medical facility or his designated delegate. The person in charge of the medical facility or his designated delegate shall then notify the local law enforcement agency having primary jurisdiction in the area in which the medical facility is located of the contents of the report. The report shall contain the name and address of the patient, the nature and extent of the patient’s injuries, and any other information that the reporting person believes might be helpful in establishing the cause of the injuries and the identity of the perpetrator.

Any person or persons participating in the making of a report or causing a report to be made to the appropriate police authority pursuant to this Code section or participating in any judicial proceeding or any other proceeding resulting therefrom shall in so doing be immune from any civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed, providing such participation pursuant to this Code section shall be in good faith.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1913, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1040, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1249, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 898, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-13/SB 433.

Law reviews.

For article, “Hospital Liability for Physician Negligence in Georgia: A Realistic Approach,” see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 701 (1986).

31-7-10.
Certification and approval of hospitals eligible to render service under a group nonprofit hospital insurance plan; supervision of such hospitals; withdrawal of approval.

The department shall (1) certify and approve hospitals applying therefor which may be found to be eligible to render hospital service under any group nonprofit hospital insurance plan, which plan may be approved and become effective, and (2) supervise the services rendered by hospitals operating under such plan, with authority to withdraw approval from any hospital which subsequently may, under rules and regulations of the board, become ineligible for rendering such services, provided that, in fixing rules and regulations in this connection or in enforcing such rules, hospitals interested therein shall be given opportunity to be heard.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 6.

Law reviews.

For article, “Entity and Identity,” see 60 Emory L.J. 1257 (2011).

31-7-11.
Written summary of hospital service charge rates.

Any hospital shall, upon request, provide a written summary of certain hospital and related services charges, including but not limited to:

The average total charges per patient day for the facility’s previous fiscal year;

The daily rate for a room in said hospital, which rate shall include an explanation of the categories of services included in said charge;

Anesthesia charges, with an explanation of the categories of services included in this charge;

Operating room charges;

Recovery room charges;

Intravenous administration charges;

Emergency room charges, with an explanation of the categories of services included in the charge;

The charge for the patient care kit or admission kit or other such items furnished to the patient on admission;

Charges for specific routine tests, including but not limited to a complete blood count, urinalysis, and chest X-ray; and

Charges for specific special tests, including but not limited to electrocardiogram, electroencephalogram, CAT scan of the head, CAT scan of liver, CAT scan of lungs, CAT scan of skeletal system, spirometry, and complete pulmonary function.

Such written summary of charges shall be composed in a simple clear fashion so as to enable consumers to compare hospital charges and make cost-effective decisions in the purchase of hospital services.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section and shall implement such regulations as provided in Code Section 31-7-2.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1307, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 31.

Code Commission notes.

Code Section 31-7-11 was added to the Code by both Ga. L. 1983, p. 1307, § 1 and Ga. L. 1984, p. 778, § 1. The former is set out above and the latter has been redesignated as Code Section 31-7-13 pursuant to the authority granted in Code Section 28-9-5.

Law reviews.

For article, “Price Transparency and Incomplete Contracts in Health Care,” see 67 Emory L.J. 1 (2017).

31-7-12.
Personal care homes; licensure and registration; inspection by local boards; fees; investigations; waiver, variance, or exemption; staffing, training, and financial stability requirements; certified medication aides.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Direct care staff person” means any employee, facility volunteer, or contract staff who provides to residents:

Any personal services, including but not limited to, medication administration or assistance, assistance with ambulation and transfer, and essential activities of daily living such as eating, bathing, grooming, dressing, and toileting; or

Any other limited nursing services, as defined in subsection (b) of Code Section 31-7-12.2.

“Personal care home” means any dwelling, whether operated for profit or not, which undertakes through its ownership or management to provide or arrange for the provision of housing, food service, and one or more personal services for two or more adults who are not related to the owner or administrator by blood or marriage. This term shall not include host homes, as defined in paragraph (18) of subsection (b) of Code Section 37-1-20.

“Personal services” includes, but is not limited to, individual assistance with or supervision of self-administered medication and essential activities of daily living such as eating, bathing, grooming, dressing, and toileting. Personal services shall not include medical, nursing, or health services; provided, however, that the department shall be authorized to grant a waiver of this provision in the same manner as provided for in Code Section 31-7-12.3 for the waiver of rules and regulations and in the same manner and only to the same extent as granted on or before June 30, 2011.

All personal care homes shall be licensed as provided for in Code Section 31-7-3, except that, in lieu of licensure, the department may require persons who operate personal care homes with two or three beds for nonfamily adults to comply with registration requirements delineated by the department. Such registration requirements within this category shall authorize the department to promulgate pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” reasonable standards to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the occupants of such personal care homes.

Upon the designation by the department and with the consent of county boards of health, such boards may act as agents to the department in performing inspections and other authorized functions regarding personal care homes licensed under this chapter. With approval of the department, county boards of health may establish inspection fees to defray part of the costs of inspections performed for the department.

The state ombudsman or community ombudsman, on that ombudsman’s initiative or in response to complaints made by or on behalf of residents of a registered or licensed personal care home, may conduct investigations in matters within the ombudsman’s powers and duties.

The department shall promulgate procedures to govern the waiver, variance, and exemption process related to personal care homes pursuant to Chapter 2 of this title. Such procedures shall include published, measurable criteria for the decision process, shall take into account the need for protection of public and individual health, care, and safety, and shall afford an opportunity for public input into the process.

On and after July 1, 2021, personal care homes with 25 or more beds shall be required to meet the following staffing and training requirements:

Ensure that each direct care staff person receives initial and annual training covering topics specified by the department to ensure a demonstrated knowledge and understanding of caring for elderly and disabled adults; and

Maintain an average monthly minimum on-site staffing ratio of one direct care staff person for every 15 residents during all waking hours and one direct care staff person for every 20 residents during all nonwaking hours; provided, however, that either such ratio is adequate to meet the needs of the residents.

On and after July 1, 2021, personal care homes with 25 or more beds shall be required to meet the following financial stability requirements:

Upon initial application for licensure, provide a financial stability affidavit to the department from a certified public accountant affirming the applicant’s ability to operate as a going concern for the next two years;

Provide a minimum of 60 days’ written notice to the department and all residents of any impending bankruptcy or property eviction that may force discharge or relocation of residents or otherwise adversely impact the provision of safe care and oversight; and

Provide a minimum of 14 days’ written notice to the department and all residents of any impending change of ownership that may force discharge or relocation of residents or otherwise adversely impact the provision of safe care and oversight.

A personal care home with 25 or more beds which operates a memory care center in its facility may employ certified medication aides for the purpose of performing the technical aspects of the administration of certain medications in accordance with this subsection. Any such personal care home may utilize certified medication aides in its memory care center and anywhere in the same building in which the memory care center is located. A personal care home that employs one or more certified medication aides must have a safe medication and treatment administration system that meets all the requirements of this subsection.

A personal care home may not employ an individual as a medication aide unless such individual is listed in the medication aide registry established by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (g) of Code Section 31-7-12.2 in good standing. An applicant for certification as a medication aide shall meet the qualifications contained in paragraph (3) of subsection (g) of Code Section 31-7-12.2.

A personal care home shall annually conduct a comprehensive clinical skills competency review of each medication aide employed by the personal care home.

A medication aide who meets the criteria established in this subsection shall be permitted to perform the following tasks in a personal care home in accordance with the written instructions of a physician:

Administer physician ordered oral, ophthalmic, topical, otic, nasal, vaginal, and rectal medications;

Administer insulin, epinephrine, and B12 pursuant to physician direction and protocol;

Administer medication via a metered dose inhaler;

Conduct finger stick blood glucose testing following established protocol;

Administer a commercially prepared disposable enema as ordered by a physician;

Assist residents in the supervision of self-administration of medication; and

Administer liquid morphine to a resident of the personal care home who is the patient of a licensed hospice, pursuant to a hospice physician’s written order that contains specific instructions for indication, dosage, frequency, and route of administration, provided that the licensed hospice consents to the use and administration of liquid morphine as described in this subparagraph. The medication aide shall observe and document the resident’s need for all “as needed” (PRN) liquid morphine in such resident’s record and such indications of need may include verbalizations of pain, groaning, grimacing, or restlessness. The initial dose of any liquid morphine administered pursuant to this subparagraph shall be administered and assessed by a licensed hospice health care professional to observe and address any adverse reactions to such medication. The personal care home shall ensure that any medication aides who will be administering liquid morphine to any hospice patients in such personal care home pursuant to this subparagraph receive adequate training from a licensed hospice on the safe and proper administration of liquid morphine prior to such administration and on an annual basis thereafter. The personal care home shall maintain documentation of all training provided and shall adhere to all security and storage requirements for liquid morphine required under state and federal law, including but not limited to, any rules promulgated by the department. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the supply of liquid morphine on-site at the personal care home shall be limited to no more than 50 ml for each hospice patient in the personal care home and shall only be administered under limited circumstances when a licensed hospice health care professional is not otherwise available. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this subparagraph.

A medication aide shall record in the medication administration record all medications that such medication aide has personally administered to a resident of a personal care home and any refusal of a resident to take a medication. A medication aide shall observe a resident to whom medication has been administered and shall report any changes in the condition of such resident to the personal representative or legal surrogate of such resident.

All medication administered by a medication aide in accordance with this subsection shall be in unit or multidose packaging.

A personal care home that employs one or more medication aides to administer medications in accordance with this subsection shall secure the services of a licensed pharmacist to perform the following duties:

Perform a quarterly review of the drug regimen of each resident of the personal care home and report any irregularities to the personal care home administrator;

Remove for proper disposal any drugs that are expired, discontinued, in a deteriorated condition, or when the resident for whom such drugs were ordered is no longer a resident;

Establish or review policies and procedures for safe and effective drug therapy, distribution, use, and control; and

Monitor compliance with established policies and procedures for medication handling and storage.

A personal care home that employs one or more medication aides to administer medications in accordance with this subsection shall ensure that each medication aide receives ongoing medication training as prescribed by the department. A registered professional nurse or licensed pharmacist shall conduct random medication administration observations on a quarterly basis and report any issues to the personal care home administrator.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1323, § 1.1; Code 1981, §

31-7-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 31; Ga. L. 1984, p. 649, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 952, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 31; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1392, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 317, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 263, § 1/SB 469; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-27/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 13/SB 178; Ga. L. 2020, p. 95, § 5/HB 987.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, added paragraph (a)(1); redesignated former paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) as present paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(3), respectively; and added subsections (f) — (h).

Code Commission notes.

Code Section 31-7-11 was added to the Code by both Ga. L. 1983, p. 1307, § 1 and Ga. L. 1983, p. 1323, § 1.1. The latter section was redesignated as Code Section 31-7-12 by Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 31, effective February 3, 1984, pursuant to the authority granted in Code Section 28-9-5.

31-7-12.1.
Unlicensed personal care home; civil penalties; negligence per se for certain legal claims; declared nuisance dangerous to public health, safety, and welfare; criminal sanctions.

A facility shall be deemed to be an “unlicensed personal care home” if it is unlicensed and not exempt from licensure and:

The facility is providing personal services and is operating as a personal care home as those terms are defined in Code Section 31-7-12;

The facility is held out as or represented as providing personal services and operating as a personal care home as those terms are defined in Code Section 31-7-12; or

The facility represents itself as a licensed personal care home.

Any unlicensed personal care home shall be assessed by the department, after opportunity for hearing in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” a civil penalty in the amount of $100.00 per bed per day for each day of violation of subsection (b) of Code Section 31-7-12. The department shall send a notice by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery stating that licensure is required and the department’s intent to impose a civil penalty. Such notice shall be deemed to be constructively received on the date of the first attempt to deliver such notice by the United States Postal Service. The department shall take no action to collect such civil penalty until after opportunity for a hearing.

In addition to other remedies available to the department, the civil penalty authorized by subsection (b) of this Code section shall be doubled if the owner or operator continues to operate the unlicensed personal care home, after receipt of notice pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

The owner or operator of a personal care home who is assessed a civil penalty in accordance with this Code section may have review of such civil penalty by appeal to the superior court in the county in which the action arose or to the Superior Court of Fulton County in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 31-5-3.

In addition to the sanctions authorized herein, an unlicensed personal care home shall be deemed to be negligent per se in the event of any claim for personal injury or wrongful death of a resident.

It is declared that the owning or operating of an unlicensed personal care home in this state constitutes a nuisance dangerous to the public health, safety, and welfare. The commissioner or the district attorney of the judicial circuit in which such unlicensed personal care home is located may file a petition to abate such nuisance as provided in Chapter 2 of Title 41.

Upon the designation by the department and with the consent of any local or state law enforcement agency, and subject to a written memorandum of understanding between the department and such agencies, Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training certified investigators of such law enforcement agencies may act as agents of the department in conducting inspections of unlicensed personal care homes required to be licensed under this chapter. Such investigations shall be limited to instances where a law enforcement agency is performing law enforcement duties and has consent or a warrant to enter the home. Law enforcement agencies shall not be authorized to recoup any of the costs of inspections performed pursuant to this subsection from the department.

Any person who owns or operates a personal care home in violation of subsection (b) of Code Section 31-7-12 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for a first violation, unless such violation is in conjunction with a violation of Article 8 of Chapter 5 of Title 16, in which case such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years. Upon conviction for a second or subsequent such violation, such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than ten years.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-12.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 461, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 13A/SB 178; Ga. L. 2012, p. 351, § 3/HB 1110; Ga. L. 2014, p. 682, § 1/HB 899; Ga. L. 2019, p. 81, § 7/HB 424.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 18, 2019, added subsection (g); redesignated former subsection (g) as present subsection (h); and substituted “a violation of Article 8 of Chapter 5 of Title 16” for “abuse, neglect, or exploitation as defined in Code Section 30-5-3” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (h).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment was applicable to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.